Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-929
Baccalaureate occupational, defined.

Baccalaureate occupational shall mean those degree programs intended by an institution to prepare an individual for a specific occupation or career. Such programs include but are not limited to: (1) Agriculture and natural resources; (2) communications; (3) business and management; (4) computer and information sciences; (5) home economics; (6) fine and applied arts; and (7) specific areas in the social sciences.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 13.